Utah statutes.
72-5-110.   Acquisition of personal property.

The department may acquire by gift, agreement, exchange, purchase, or otherwise machinery, tools, equipment, materials, supplies, or other personal property necessary for the administration, construction, maintenance, and operation of the state highways, and may sell, exchange, or otherwise dispose of the machinery, tools, equipment, materials, supplies, and other personal property when no longer suitable or required for state transportation purposes.

